Mississippi, session 2026, SB2211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  The Public Service Commission shall study the Mississippi electric grid and the computer systems and networks related to it.  The study must: (a)  Evaluate and summarize the current state of the electric grid and associated computer systems and networks; (b)  Consider potential security threats to the electric grid and associated computer systems and networks, including the threat of electromagnetic pulse attacks; (c)  Assess whether further efforts are needed to secure or diversify the electric grid and associated computer systems and networks against damage, including from the threat of electromagnetic pulses, solar flares or other attacks and natural threats; and (d)  Recommend measures to secure and diversify the electric grid and associated computer systems and networks against damage. (2)  The commission may share its findings with any state agency it considers important to the security and diversification of the electric grid or associated computer systems or networks.  To the extent allowed by law, a state agency with which the commission shares information is encouraged to implement any recommendations that the agency determines will improve the security of the state's electric grid or associated computer systems or networks. (3)  Not later than December 1, 2027, the commission shall prepare a report of its findings, including any recommendations for legislation resulting from the findings, and shall submit the report to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. (4)  The work of the commission described in this act relates to sensitive matters of security. Notwithstanding any other law, the meetings, work and findings of the commission as described in this act are not subject to the requirements of Chapter 41 or 61 of Title 25, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.